District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0260.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Fiscal Year 2026 Local Budget Act of 2025”.
Sec. 2. Adoption of the local portion of the Fiscal Year 2026 budget.
The following expenditure levels are adopted pursuant to section 446(a) of the District of
Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 801; D.C. Official Code § 1-
204.46(a)), as the local portion of the budget for the government of the District of Columbia for
the fiscal year ending September 30, 2026.
DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA BUDGET FOR THE FISCAL YEAR
ENDING SEPTEMBER 30, 2026
The following amounts are appropriated for the District of Columbia government for the
fiscal year ending September 30, 2026 (“Fiscal Year 2026”), out of the General Fund of the
District of Columbia (“General Fund”), except as otherwise specifically provided; provided, that
notwithstanding any other provision of law, except as provided in sections 446A, 446B, and
450A of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved November 22, 2000 (114 Stat. 2440;
D.C. Official Code §§ 1-204.46a, 1-204.46b, and 1-204.50a), D.C. Official Code §§ 47-369.01
and 47-369.02, and provisions of this act, the total amount appropriated in this act for operating
expenses for the District of Columbia for Fiscal Year 2026 shall not exceed the sum of the total
revenues of the District of Columbia for such fiscal year or $22,034,524,408 (of which
$12,041,393,772 shall be from local funds, $798,197,180 shall be from dedicated taxes,
$1,567,365,113 shall be from federal grant funds, $4,191,881,580 shall be from Medicaid
payments, $791,747,503 shall be from other funds, $38,500,000 shall be from other federal
funds, $16,368,577 shall be from private grant funds, $1,215,856 shall be from private donations,
$143,298,000 shall be from funds requested to be appropriated by the Congress as federal
payments pursuant to the Fiscal Year 2026 Federal Portion Budget Request Act of 2025, passed
1

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
on July 1, 2025 (Enrolled version of Bill 26-261) (“Fiscal Year 2026 Federal Portion Budget
Request Act of 2025”), $227,140,700 shall be from enterprise and other funds – dedicated taxes,
and $2,217,416,127 shall be from enterprise and other funds); provided further, that of the local
funds, such amounts as may be necessary may be derived from the General Fund balance;
provided further, that amounts appropriated under this act shall be increased or decreased to
reflect the amount of federal payment funds appropriated by Congress for Fiscal Year 2026;
provided further, that amounts appropriated under this act may be increased by proceeds of one-
time transactions, which are expended for emergency or unanticipated operating or capital needs;
provided further, that such increases shall be approved by enactment of local District law and
shall comply with all reserve requirements contained in the District of Columbia Home Rule Act,
approved December 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 774; D.C. Official Code § 1-201.01 et seq.); provided
further, that local funds are appropriated, without regard to fiscal year, in such amounts as may
be necessary to pay vendor fees, including legal fees, that are obligated in this fiscal year, to be
paid as a fixed percentage of District revenue recovered from third parties on behalf of the
District under contracts that provide for payment of fees based upon and from such District
revenue as may be recovered by the vendor; provided further, that amounts appropriated
pursuant to this act as operating funds may be transferred to enterprise and capital funds and such
amounts, once transferred, shall retain appropriation authority consistent with the provisions of
this act; provided further, that there may be reprogrammed or transferred for operating expenses
any local funds transferred or reprogrammed in this or the 4 prior fiscal years from operating
funds to capital funds, and such amounts, once transferred or reprogrammed, shall retain
appropriation authority consistent with the provisions of this act; except, that there may not be
reprogrammed for operating expenses any funds derived from bonds, notes, or other obligations
issued for capital projects; provided further, that the local funds (including dedicated taxes) and
other funds appropriated by this act may be reprogrammed and transferred as provided in
Subchapter IV of Chapter 3 of Title 47 of the District of Columbia Official Code, or as otherwise
provided by law, through November 15, 2025; provided further, that local funds and other funds
appropriated under this act may be expended by the Mayor for the purpose of providing food and
beverages, not to exceed $30 per employee per day, to employees of the District of Columbia
government while such employees are deployed in response to or during a declared snow or
other emergency; provided further, that local funds and other funds appropriated under this act
may be expended by the Mayor to provide food and lodging, in amounts not to exceed the
General Services Administration per diem rates, for youth, young adults, and their parents or
guardians who participate in a program of the District of Columbia government that involves
overnight travel outside the District of Columbia; provided further, that notwithstanding any
other provision of law, local funds are appropriated, without regard to fiscal year, to the extent
such funds are certified as available by the Chief Financial Officer of the District of Columbia, to
pay termination costs of multiyear contracts entered into by the District of Columbia during this
fiscal year, to design, construct, improve, maintain, operate, manage, or finance infrastructure
2

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
projects procured pursuant to the Public-Private Partnership Act of 2014, effective March 11,
2015 (D.C. Law 20-228; D.C. Official Code § 2-271.01 et seq.), including, by way of example
and not limitation, a project for the replacement and modernization of the District of Columbia’s
streetlight system and a project for the rehabilitation and modernization of the Henry J. Daly
Building, and such termination costs may be paid from appropriations available for the
performance of such contracts or the payment of termination costs or from other appropriations
then available for any other purpose, not including the emergency cash reserve fund (D.C.
Official Code § 1-204.50a(a)) or the contingency cash reserve fund (D.C. Official Code § 1-
204.50a(b)), which, once allocated to these costs, shall be deemed appropriated for the purposes
of paying termination costs of such contracts and shall retain appropriations authority and remain
available until expended; provided further, that notwithstanding any other provision of law, local
funds are appropriated, without regard to fiscal year, to the extent such funds are certified as
available by the Chief Financial Officer of the District of Columbia, to pay termination, transfer,
or change of ownership costs of multiyear contracts entered into by the District of Columbia
during this fiscal year, to design, construct, improve, maintain, operate, manage, and finance
infrastructure projects for the purpose of on-site generation and distribution of energy, including,
by way of example and not limitation, a project on the St. Elizabeths campus for the construction
and operation of an energy resources microgrid, and such termination, transfer, or change of
ownership costs may be paid from appropriations available for the performance of such contracts
or the payment of termination, transfer, or change of ownership costs or from other
appropriations then available for any other purpose, not including the emergency cash reserve
fund (D.C. Official Code § 1-204.50a(a)) or the contingency cash reserve fund (D.C. Official
Code § 1-204.50a(b)), which, once allocated to these costs, shall be deemed appropriated for the
purposes of paying termination, transfer or change of ownership costs of such contracts and shall
retain appropriations authority and remain available until expended; provided further, that during
Fiscal Year 2026, notwithstanding any other provision of law, the District of Columbia may
enter into annual and multiyear agreements with the National Park Service for the purposes of
planning, designing, constructing, maintaining, improving, and operating District of Columbia
transportation infrastructure and related appurtenances on National Park Service land in the
District of Columbia, and may in each fiscal year of such agreement expend such funds to
implement the agreement as may be appropriated and available in that fiscal year for such
purposes; provided further, that notwithstanding Subchapter IV of Chapter 3 of Title 47 of the
District of Columbia Official Code, amounts appropriated from funds received from the federal
government under the American Rescue Plan Act, approved March 11, 2021 (Pub. L. No. 117-2;
135 Stat. 4) (“ARPA”) or the Coronavirus Aid, Relief, and Economic Security Act, approved
March 27, 2020 (Pub. L. No. 116-136; 134 Stat. 281) (“CARES Act”) may be transferred or
reprogrammed between appropriated funds, consistent with the requirements of the ARPA and
the CARES Act and consistent with the purpose for which the funds are appropriated under this
act, upon the request of the Mayor to the Chief Financial Officer and certification of the
3

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
availability of the funds by the Office of the Chief Financial Officer, and such amounts, once
transferred, shall retain appropriation authority consistent with the provisions of this act;
provided further, that amounts appropriated from funds received from the federal government
under the ARPA and the CARES Act shall be available until expended, provided that such funds
are expended for the same purpose for which the funds are appropriated under this act; provided
further, that the amounts appropriated from funds received from the federal government under
the Emergency Rental Program may be increased by such additional amounts as may be received
pursuant to that program during Fiscal Year 2026; provided further, that any unspent amount
remaining in a non-lapsing fund listed in the appropriations below at the end of Fiscal Year 2025
is to be continually available, allocated, and appropriated, and may be expended, for the purposes
of such fund in Fiscal Year 2026 in addition to any amounts deposited in and appropriated to
such fund in Fiscal Year 2026; provided further, that no funds shall be obligated or expended on
the Mayor’s Arts Awards; provided further, that none of the funds contained in this act for the
development of the RFK campus for the purposes of a stadium may be expended except in
accordance with the Robert F. Kennedy Campus Redevelopment Act of 2025, passed on 1st
reading on August 1, 2025 (Engrossed version of Bill 26-288), including any amendments
thereto; provided further, that the Chief Financial Officer shall take such steps as are necessary to
assure that the foregoing requirements are met, including the apportioning by the Chief Financial
Officer of the appropriations and funds made available during Fiscal Year 2026:
GOVERNMENTAL DIRECTION AND SUPPORT
For governmental direction and support, $1,284,382,595 (including $1,016,464,809 from
local funds, $220,000 from dedicated taxes, $92,275,154 from federal grant funds, $174,476,807
from other funds, and $945,825 from private funds), to be allocated as follows; provided, that
any program fees collected from the issuance of debt shall be available for the payment of
expenses of the debt management program of the District:
(1) Board of Elections. $13,957,739 (including $13,457,739 from local funds and
$500,000 in federal grant funds);
(2) Board of Ethics and Government Accountability: $4,095,650 (including
$3,937,552 from local funds and $158,098 from other funds); provided, that all funds deposited,
without regard to fiscal year, into the following funds are authorized for expenditure and shall
remain available for expenditure until September 30, 2026: the Ethics Fund, the Lobbyist
Administration and Enforcement Fund, and the Open Government Fund;
(3) Captive Insurance Agency: $11,732,526 (including $10,886,937 from local
funds and $845,589 from other funds); provided, that all funds deposited, without regard to fiscal
year, into the Medical Captive Insurance Claims Reserve Fund are authorized for expenditure
and shall remain available for expenditure until September 30, 2026; provided further, that all
funds deposited during Fiscal Year 2026 into the following funds are authorized for expenditure
and shall remain available for expenditure until September 30, 2026: the Captive Trust Fund and
4

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
the Subrogation Fund;
(4) Contract Appeals Board: $2,015,133 from local funds;
(5) Council of the District of Columbia: $39,934,656 from local funds; provided,
that not to exceed $50,000 of this amount shall be available for the Chairman for official
reception and representation expenses and for purposes consistent with the Discretionary Funds
Act of 1973, approved October 26, 1973 (87 Stat. 509; D.C. Official Code § 1-333.10); provided
further, that funds appropriated under this act may be used to pay expenses for employees of the
Council of the District of Columbia to obtain or maintain professional credentials in the District
that are related to their employment at the Council, including bar admission fees, bar dues and
fees, court admission fees, and examinations to obtain such credentials; provided further, that
funds appropriated under this act may be used for uniform apparel for employees of the Council
of the District of Columbia; provided further, that Councilmembers of the Council of the District
of Columbia may use the electric car charging station located outside the John A. Wilson
Building to charge their personal vehicles in accordance with policies established by the
Secretary to the Council; provided further, that amounts provided under this heading shall be
available for the making of payment of legal settlements or judgments that have been entered
against the Council; provided further, that not to exceed $390,000 of this amount shall be
available to assess and enhance the physical security of Councilmembers’ permanent residences,
of which not to exceed $260,000 shall be available to assess the physical security of each
Councilmember’s permanent residence and not to exceed $10,000 shall be available for each
Councilmember to implement the recommendations of the authorized security assessment to
enhance the physical security of the Councilmember’s permanent residence, consistent with a
policy promulgated by the Secretary to the Council; provided further, that all funds deposited,
without regard to fiscal year, into the Council Technology Projects Fund are authorized for
expenditure and shall remain available for expenditure until September 30, 2026;
(6) Department of General Services: $458,395,834 (including $385,805,262 from
local funds, $220,000 from dedicated taxes, and $72,370,573 from other funds); provided, that
all funds deposited during Fiscal Year 2026 into the following funds are authorized for
expenditure and shall remain available for expenditure until September 30, 2026: the Eastern
Market Enterprise Fund, the Sustainable Energy Trust Fund, and the West End Library and Fire
Station Maintenance Fund;
(7) Department of Human Resources: $20,876,005 (including $11,898,000 from
local funds and $8,978,006 from other funds); provided, that all funds deposited, without regard
to fiscal year, into the following funds are authorized for expenditure and shall remain available
for expenditure until September 30, 2026: Agreement with Independent Agencies Fund, Defined
Benefits Retirement Fund, Health Benefit Assessment Fund, and Reimbursements from Other
Governments Fund;
(8) Employees’ Compensation Fund: $18,285,541 from local funds; provided, that
all funds deposited, without regard to fiscal year, into the Employees’ Compensation Fund are
5

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
authorized for expenditure and shall remain available for expenditure until September 30, 2026;
(9) Executive Office of the Mayor: $31,497,687 (including $27,218,365 from
local funds, $4,256,208 from federal grant funds, and $23,114 from other funds); provided, that
not to exceed $25,000 of such amount, from local funds, shall be available for the Mayor for
official reception and representation expenses and for purposes consistent with the Discretionary
Funds Act of 1973, approved October 26, 1973 (87 Stat. 509; D.C. Official Code § 1-333.10);
provided further, that no nonpersonnel services funds shall be available for expenditure during a
period of budget delivery delay pursuant to section 1072 of the Accountability for Delaying the
Budget Amendment Act of 2025, passed on 2nd reading on July 28, 2025 (Enrolled version of
Bill 26-265); provided further, that all funds deposited during Fiscal Year 2026 into the
following funds are authorized for expenditure and shall remain available for expenditures until
September 30, 2026: the Emancipation Day Fund, the Office of Lesbian, Gay, Bisexual,
Transgender, and Questioning Affairs Fund, and the Office of Veterans Affairs Fund;
(10) Mayor’s Office of Legal Counsel: $1,849,788 from local funds;
(11) Metropolitan Washington Council of Governments: $1,301,789 from local
funds;
(12) Office of Advisory Neighborhood Commissions: $2,532,071 from local
funds; provided, that all funds deposited, without regard to fiscal year, into the following funds
are authorized for expenditure and shall remain available for expenditure until September 30,
2026: the Advisory Neighborhood Commissions Technical Support and Assistance Fund and the
Office of Advisory Neighborhood Commission Security Fund;
(13) Office of Campaign Finance: $16,838,290 from local funds; provided, that
all funds deposited during Fiscal Year 2026 into the Fair Elections Fund are authorized for
expenditure and shall remain available for expenditure until September 30, 2026;
(14) Office of Contracting and Procurement: $29,449,962 (including $23,649,963
from local funds and $5,800,000 from other funds); provided, that all funds deposited during
Fiscal Year 2026 into the Surplus Property Fund are authorized for expenditure and shall remain
available for expenditure until September 30, 2026;
(15) Office of Disability Rights: $3,898,103 (including $3,274,019 from local
funds and $624,084 from federal grant funds);
(16) Office of Employee Appeals: $2,676,835 from local funds;
(17) Office of Finance and Resource Management: $31,591,528 (including
$31,368,825 from local funds and $222,703 from other funds); provided, that all funds deposited
during Fiscal Year 2026 into the Utilities Payment for Non-DC Agencies Fund are authorized for
expenditure and shall remain available for expenditure until September 30, 2026;
(18) Office of Labor Relations and Collective Bargaining: $3,464,035 from local
funds;
(19) Office of Risk Management: $4,365,999 from local funds; provided, that all
funds deposited during Fiscal Year 2026 into the Subrogation Fund are authorized for
6

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
expenditure and shall remain available for expenditure until September 30, 2026;
(20) Office of the Attorney General for the District of Columbia: $157,036,783
(including $97,135,993 from local funds, $36,175,636 from federal grant funds, $22,779,329
from other funds, and $945,825 from private funds); provided, that not to exceed $25,000 of this
amount, from local funds, shall be available for the Attorney General for official reception and
representation expenses and for purposes consistent with the Discretionary Funds Act of 1973,
approved October 26, 1973 (87 Stat. 509; D.C. Official Code § 1-333.10); provided further, that
local and other funds appropriated under this act may be used to pay expenses for District
government attorneys at the Office of the Attorney General for the District of Columbia to obtain
professional credentials, including bar dues and court admission fees, that enable these attorneys
to practice law in other state and federal jurisdictions and appear outside the District in state and
federal courts; provided further, that all funds deposited, without regard to fiscal year, into the
following funds are authorized for expenditure and shall remain available for expenditure until
September 30, 2026: the Child Support-Reimbursements and Fees Fund, the Child Support-
Interest Income Fund, the Child Support-Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Fund, the
Drug-, Firearm-, or Prostitution-Related Nuisance Abatement Fund, and the Litigation Support
Fund; provided further, that this amount may be further increased by amounts deposited into the
Attorney General Restitution Fund, the Vulnerable and Elderly Person Exploitation Restitution
Fund, and the Tenant Receivership Abatement Fund, which shall be continually available,
without regard to fiscal year, until expended;
(21) Office of the Chief Financial Officer: $214,660,611 (including $178,551,746
from local funds, $1,678,000 from federal grant funds, and $34,430,865 from other funds);
provided, that not to exceed $10,600 of such amount, from local funds, shall be available for the
Chief Financial Officer for official reception and representation expenses and for purposes
consistent with the Discretionary Funds Act of 1973, approved October 26, 1973 (87 Stat. 509;
D.C. Official Code § 1-333.10); provided further, that amounts appropriated by this act may be
increased by the amount required to pay banking fees for maintaining the funds of the District of
Columbia; provided further, that all funds deposited, without regard to fiscal year, into the
following funds are authorized for expenditure and shall remain available for expenditure until
September 30, 2026: the Other Post-Employment Benefits Fund and the Child Trust Fund;
provided further, that all funds deposited during Fiscal Year 2026 into the following funds are
authorized for expenditure and shall remain available for expenditure until September 30, 2026:
the DC Lottery Reimbursement Fund, the Defined Contribution Plan Administration Fund, the
Delinquent Debt Fund, the Dishonored Check Fees Fund, the Health Benefits Fees Fund, the
Payroll Services Fees Fund, the Recorder of Deeds Automation Fund, the Service Contracts
Fund, and the Tobacco Fund Reimbursement Fund;
(22) Office of the Chief Technology Officer: $163,902,537 (including
$91,155,926 from local funds, $45,970,987 from federal grant funds, and $26,775,624 from
other funds); provided, that all funds deposited, without regard to fiscal year, into the following
7

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
funds are authorized for expenditure and shall remain available for expenditure until September
30, 2026: the DC-NET Services and Innovation Fund and the Technology Infrastructure Services
Support Fund;
(23) Office of the City Administrator: $9,898,075 from local funds; provided, that
not to exceed $10,600 of such amount, from local funds, shall be available for the City
Administrator for official reception and representation expenses and for purposes consistent with
the Discretionary Funds Act of 1973, approved October 26, 1973 (87 Stat. 509; D.C. Official
Code § 1-333.10); provided further, that no nonpersonnel services funds shall be available for
expenditure during a period of budget delivery delay pursuant to section 1072 of the
Accountability for Delaying the Budget Amendment Act of 2025, passed on 2nd reading on July
28, 2025 (Enrolled version of Bill 26-265);
(24) Office of the District of Columbia Auditor: $7,805,591 from local funds;
provided, that all funds deposited, without regard to fiscal year, into the Audit Engagement Fund
are authorized for expenditure and shall remain available for expenditure until September 30,
2026;
(25) Office of the Inspector General: $23,467,667 (including $19,397,428 from
local funds, $3,070,239 from federal grant funds, and $1,000,000 from other funds); provided,
that all funds deposited, without regard to fiscal year, into the Inspector General Support Fund
are authorized for expenditure and shall remain available for expenditure until September 30,
2026;
(26) Office of the Secretary: $5,483,426 (including $4,390,519 from local funds
and $1,092,907 from other funds); provided, that all funds deposited during Fiscal Year 2026
into the Distribution Fee Fund are authorized for expenditure and shall remain available for
expenditure until September 30, 2026;
(27) Office of the Senior Advisor: $1,633,284 from local funds;
(28) Public Employee Relations Board: $1,403,566 from local funds;
(29) Statehood Initiatives: $266,883 from local funds; provided, that all funds
deposited, without regard to fiscal year, into the New Columbia Statehood Fund are authorized
for expenditure and shall remain available for expenditure until September 30, 2026; and
(30) Uniform Law Commission: $65,000 from local funds.
ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT AND REGULATION
For economic development and regulation, $549,265,768 (including $362,537,614 from
local funds, $55,858,944 from dedicated taxes, $37,313,694 from federal grant funds,
$55,055,516 from other funds, and $38,500,000 from other federal funds), to be allocated as
follows:
(1) Business Improvement Districts Transfer: $39,810,000 (including $810,000
from local funds and $39,000,000 from other funds); provided, that, in the event that revenue
dedicated by local law to a Business Improvement District exceeds the amount set forth in this
8

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
paragraph, the General Fund budget authority may be increased as needed to transfer all such
revenue, pursuant to local law, to the Business Improvement District.
(2) Commission on the Arts and Humanities: $45,731,408 (including $44,754,343
from dedicated taxes and $977,065 from federal grant funds); provided, that all dedicated taxes
shall be deposited into the Arts and Humanities Fund; provided further, that all funds deposited,
without regard to fiscal year, into the Arts and Humanities Fund are authorized for expenditure
and shall remain available for expenditure until September 30, 2026; provided further, that
budgeted funds in the available fund balance of the Arts and Humanities Fund may be obligated
in Fiscal Year 2026 pursuant to grant awards, through September 30, 2029 and that such funds so
obligated are authorized for expenditure and shall remain available for expenditure until
September 30, 2029;
(3) Department of Housing and Community Development: $130,444,940
(including $54,068,825 from local funds, $34,018,415 from federal grant funds, $38,500,000
from other federal funds, and $3,857,700 from other funds); provided, that of such funds, the
funds allocated to the District from the Homeowner Assistance Fund established under section
3206 of the American Rescue Plan Act of 2021, approved March 11, 2021 (135 Stat. 63; 15
U.S.C. § 9058d), shall remain available until expended; provided further, that all funds
deposited, without regard to fiscal year, into the following funds are authorized for expenditure
and shall remain available for expenditure until September 30, 2026: the Home Again Revolving
Fund, the Housing Preservation Fund, the Negotiated Employee Affordable Housing Fund, and
the Section 108 Debt Reserve Account; provided further, that all funds deposited, without regard
to fiscal year, into the Rental Housing Registration Fund are authorized for expenditure starting
at the beginning of the applicable time period set forth section in 203e(d) of the Rental Housing
Act of 1985, effective October 30, 2018 (D.C. Law 22-168; D.C. Official Code § 42-
3502.03e(d)), and shall remain available for expenditure until September 30, 2026; provided
further, that all funds deposited during Fiscal Year 2026 into the following funds are authorized
for expenditure and shall remain available for expenditure until September 30, 2026: the
Department of Housing and Community Development Unified Fund and the Home Purchase
Assistance Fund; provided further, that the amount of local funds appropriated for the
Department of Housing and Community Development shall be increased by up to $1,000,000
pursuant to paragraph (2) under the heading “Appropriation of Additional Resources”;
(4) Department of Small and Local Business Development: $22,991,667
(including $22,297,141 from local funds and $694,526 from federal grant funds); provided, that
all funds deposited, without regard to fiscal year, into the following funds are authorized for
expenditure and shall remain available for expenditure until September 30, 2026: the Small
Business Capital Access Fund, the Small Business Licensing Fee Reimbursement Relief Fund,
and the Streetscape Business Development Relief Fund;
(5) Housing Authority Payment: $178,408,049 from local funds;
(6) Housing Production Trust Fund Subsidy: $40,743,000 from local funds;
9

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
(7) Office of Cable Television, Film, Music, and Entertainment: $13,174,176
(including $6,899,293 from local funds and $6,274,883 from other funds); provided, that all
funds deposited, without regard to fiscal year, into the following funds are authorized for
expenditure and shall remain available for expenditure until September 30, 2026: the Film,
Television and the Entertainment Rebate Fund; provided further, that all funds deposited during
Fiscal Year 2026 into the OCTFME Special Account are authorized for expenditure and shall
remain available for expenditure until September 30, 2026;
(8) Office of Planning: $15,597,904 (including $14,944,215 from local funds,
$623,689 from federal grant funds, and $30,000 from other funds); provided, that all funds
deposited during Fiscal Year 2026 into the following funds are authorized for expenditure and
shall remain available for expenditure until September 30, 2026: the Historic Landmark-District
Protection (Local) Fund, the Targeted Homeowner Grant Fund, and the Historical Landmark-
District Protection (O-Type) Fund;
(9) Office of the Deputy Mayor for Planning and Economic Development:
$50,201,131 (including $32,802,013 from local funds, $11,104,601 from dedicated taxes,
$1,000,000 from federal grant funds, and $5,294,517 from other funds); provided, that all funds
deposited, without regard to fiscal year, into the following funds are authorized for expenditure
and shall remain available for expenditure until September 30, 2026: the Economic Development
Special Account, the Industrial Revenue Bond Account, the Soccer Stadium Financing Fund, the
Vitality Fund, and the Walter Reed Reinvestment Fund; provided further, that all funds deposited
during Fiscal Year 2026 into the following funds are authorized for expenditure and shall remain
available for expenditure until September 30, 2026: the St. Elizabeths East Campus
Redevelopment Fund and the Walter Reed Redevelopment Fund;
(10) Office of the Tenant Advocate: $4,461,316 (including $3,862,901 from local
funds and $598,416 from other funds); provided, that all funds deposited during Fiscal Year
2026 into the Rental Unit Fee Fund are authorized for expenditure and shall remain available for
expenditure until September 30, 2026;
(11) Office of Zoning: $4,367,281 from local funds;
(12) Real Property Tax Appeals Commission: $2,046,817 from local funds; and
(13) Rental Housing Commission: $1,288,079 from local funds.
PUBLIC SAFETY AND JUSTICE
For public safety and justice, $1,951,987,443 (including $1,602,427,655 from local
funds, $295,921,552 from federal grant funds, $300,000 from Medicaid payments, $48,072,106
from other funds, $598,000 from federal payment funds requested to be appropriated by the
Congress under the heading “Federal Payment for Judicial Commissions” in the Fiscal Year
2026 Federal Portion Budget Request Act of 2025, $600,000 from federal payment funds
requested to be appropriated by the Congress under the heading “Federal Payment for the
District of Columbia National Guard” in the Fiscal Year 2026 Federal Portion Budget Request
10

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
Act of 2025, $2,750,000 from federal payment funds requested to be appropriated by the
Congress under the heading “Federal Payment to the Criminal Justice Coordinating Council” in
the Fiscal Year 2026 Federal Portion Budget Request Act of 2025, $350,000 from federal
payment funds requested to be appropriated by the Congress under the heading “Federal
Payment for Judicial Commissions” in the Fiscal Year 2026 Federal Portion Budget Request Act
of 2025, and $968,129 from private funds), provided, that these amounts shall be increased or
decreased to reflect the amount of federal payment funds appropriated by Congress for Fiscal
Year 2026, to be allocated as follows:
(1) Commission on Judicial Disabilities and Tenure: $1,244,426 (including
$646,426 from local funds and $598,000 from federal payment funds requested to be
appropriated by the Congress under the heading “Federal Payment for Judicial Commissions” in
the Fiscal Year 2026 Federal Portion Budget Request Act of 2025); provided, that these amounts
shall be increased or decreased to reflect the amount of federal payment funds appropriated by
Congress for the agency for Fiscal Year 2026;
(2) Corrections Information Council: $1,243,989 from local funds;
(3) Criminal Justice Coordinating Council: $5,057,803 (including $2,052,803
from local funds, $255,000 from federal grant funds, and $2,750,000 from federal payment funds
requested to be appropriated by the Congress under the heading “Federal Payment to the
Criminal Justice Coordinating Council” in the Fiscal Year 2026 Federal Portion Budget Request
Act of 2025); provided, that these amounts shall be increased or decreased to reflect the amount
of federal payment funds appropriated by Congress for the agency for Fiscal Year 2026;
(4) Department of Corrections: $228,239,427 (including $210,413,451 from local
funds, $620,208 from federal grant funds, and $17,205,767 from other funds); provided, that all
funds deposited in Fiscal Year 2026 into the following funds are authorized for expenditure and
shall remain available for expenditure until September 30, 2026: the Correction Reimbursement-
Juveniles Fund, the Department of Corrections Reimbursement Fund, and the Inmate Welfare
Fund;
(5) Department of Forensic Sciences: $31,075,121 (including $29,505,179 from
local funds, $601,812 from federal grant funds, and $968,129 from private funds); provided, that
all funds deposited, without regard to fiscal year, into the Department of Forensic Sciences
Laboratory Fund are authorized for expenditure and shall remain available for expenditure until
September 30, 2026; provided further, that the amount of local funds appropriated for the
Department of Forensic Sciences shall be increased by up to $3,500,000 pursuant to paragraph
(2) under the heading “Appropriation of Additional Resources”;
(6) Department of Youth Rehabilitation Services: $97,478,495 from local funds;
(7) District of Columbia National Guard: $23,033,855 (including $6,723,347 from
local funds, $15,680,507 from federal grant funds, $30,000 from other funds, and $600,000 from
federal payment funds requested to be appropriated by the Congress under the heading “Federal
Payment for the District of Columbia National Guard” in the Fiscal Year 2026 Federal Portion
11

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
Budget Request Act of 2025); provided, that these amounts shall be increased or decreased to
reflect the amount of federal payment funds appropriated by Congress for the agency for Fiscal
Year 2026; provided further, that the Mayor shall reimburse the District of Columbia National
Guard for expenses incurred in connection with services that are performed in emergencies by
the National Guard in a militia status and are requested by the Mayor, in amounts that shall be
jointly determined and certified as due and payable for these services by the Mayor and the
Commanding General of the District of Columbia National Guard; provided further, that such
sums as may be necessary for reimbursement to the District of Columbia National Guard under
the preceding proviso shall be available pursuant to this act, and the availability of the sums shall
be deemed as constituting payment in advance for emergency services involved;
(8) District of Columbia Sentencing Commission: $1,821,081 from local funds;
(9) Fire and Emergency Medical Services Department: $369,840,752 (including
$300,808,134 from local funds, $67,233,158 from federal grant funds, and $1,799,460 from
other funds); provided, that all funds deposited in Fiscal Year 2026 into the Fire and Emergency
Medical Services Department EMS Reform Fund are authorized for expenditure and shall remain
available for expenditure until September 30, 2026;
(10) Homeland Security and Emergency Management Agency: $197,927,629
(including $6,161,526 from local funds and $191,766,103 from federal grant funds);
(11) Judicial Nomination Commission: $387,355 (including $37,355 from local
funds and $350,000 from federal payment funds requested to be appropriated by the Congress
under the heading “Federal Payment for Judicial Commissions” in the Fiscal Year 2026 Federal
Portion Budget Request Act of 2025); provided, that these amounts shall be increased or
decreased to reflect the amount of federal payment funds appropriated by Congress for the
agency for Fiscal Year 2026;
(12) Metropolitan Police Department: $599,133,934 (including $588,573,281
from local funds, $4,132,706 from federal grant funds, and $6,427,947 from other funds);
provided, that all funds deposited during Fiscal Year 2026 into the following funds are
authorized for expenditure and shall remain available for expenditure until September 30, 2026:
the Asset Forfeiture Fund and the Miscellaneous Fund;
(13) Office of Administrative Hearings: $13,330,572 (including $13,030,572
from local funds and $300,000 from Medicaid payments);
(14) Office of Human Rights: $9,642,219 (including $9,229,459 from local funds
and $412,760 from federal grant funds);
(15) Office of Neighborhood Safety and Engagement: $24,414,508 from local
funds; provided, that the Office of Neighborhood Safety and Engagement is authorized to spend
appropriated funds for the purposes set forth in section 101 of the Neighborhood Engagement
Achieves Results Amendment Act of 2016, effective June 30, 2016 (D.C. Law 21-125; D.C.
Official Code § 7-2411); provided further, that all funds deposited, without regard to fiscal year,
into the Neighborhood Safety and Engagement Fund are authorized for expenditure and shall
12

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
remain available for expenditure until September 30, 2026;
(16) Office of Police Complaints: $3,291,833 from local funds;
(17) Office of the Chief Medical Examiner: $16,232,273 (including $15,693,924
from local funds, $223,049 from federal grant funds, and $315,299 from other funds); provided,
that all funds deposited in Fiscal Year 2026 into the Medical Examiner Pathology and
Toxicology Fund are authorized for expenditure and shall remain available for expenditure until
September 30, 2026;
(18) Office of the Deputy Mayor for Public Safety and Justice: $15,850,252 from
local funds;
(19) Office of Unified Communications: $64,693,200 (including $45,556,228
from local funds and $19,136,972 from other funds); provided, that all funds deposited, without
regard to fiscal year, into the Emergency and Non-Emergency Number Telephone Calling
Systems Fund are authorized for expenditure and shall remain available for expenditure until
September 30, 2026; provided further, that all funds deposited during Fiscal Year 2026 into the
Public Services Telecommunications Fund are authorized for expenditure and shall remain
available for expenditure until September 30, 2026;
(20) Office of Victim Services and Justice Grants: $110,429,719 (including
$92,276,811 from local funds, $14,996,247 from federal grant funds, and $3,156,661 from other
funds); provided, that $31,785,256 shall be made available to award a grant to the District of
Columbia Bar Foundation for the purpose of administering the Access to Justice Initiative,
including the Access to Justice Grants Program, the District of Columbia Poverty Lawyer Loan
Repayment Assistance Program, and the Civil Legal Counsel Projects Program; provided further,
that the funds authorized for expenditure for the Access to Justice Initiative shall remain
available for expenditure, without regard to fiscal year, until September 30, 2026; provided, that
all funds deposited, without regard to fiscal year, into the Crime Victims Assistance Fund are
authorized for expenditure and shall remain available for expenditure until September 30, 2026;
provided further, that all funds deposited during Fiscal Year 2026 into the following funds are
authorized for expenditure and shall remain available for expenditure until September 30, 2026:
the Community-Based Violence Reduction Fund and the Private Security Camera Incentive
Fund; and
(21) Police Officers’ and Firefighters’ Retirement System: $137,619,000 from
local funds.
PUBLIC EDUCATION SYSTEMS
For the public education systems, $4,308,204,647 (including $3,734,638,532 from local
funds, $392,374,791 from federal grant funds, $97,021,590 from other funds, $40,000,000 from
federal payment funds requested to be appropriated by the Congress under the heading “Federal
Payment for Resident Tuition Support” in the Fiscal Year 2026 Federal Portion Budget Request
Act of 2025 for the purposes specified in sections 3 and 5 of the District of Columbia College
13

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
Access Act of 1999, approved November 12, 1999 (113 Stat 1328; D.C. Official Code §§ 38-
2702 and 38-2704), $35,000,000 from federal payment funds requested to be appropriated by the
Congress under the heading “Federal Payment for School Improvement” in the Fiscal Year 2026
Federal Portion Budget Request Act of 2025 for the purposes specified in section 3004(b) of the
Scholarships for Opportunity and Results Act, approved April 15, 2011 (125 Stat 200; D.C.
Official Code § 38-1853.04(b)), and $9,169,734 from private funds); provided, that these
amounts shall be increased or decreased to reflect the amount of federal payment funds
appropriated by Congress for Fiscal Year 2026, to be allocated as follows:
(1) Department of Employment Services: $181,572,418 (including $68,530,515
from local funds, $47,464,482 from federal grant funds, $64,321,634 from other funds, and
$1,255,788 from private funds); provided, that the Department of Employment Services is
authorized to spend appropriated funds to provide food and non-alcoholic beverages and
monetary and non-monetary incentives for participants in its programs, as provided by other
District or federal law, and to provide food and non-alcoholic beverages to its employees, as
provided by other District or federal law; provided further, that all funds deposited, without
regard to fiscal year, into the following funds are authorized for expenditure and shall remain
available for expenditure until September 30, 2026: the Reed Act Fund, the Unemployment and
Workforce Development Administrative Fund, the Unemployment Insurance Interest Account,
the Unemployment Insurance Special Administrative Expense Account, the Universal Paid
Leave Administration Fund, the Workers’ Compensation Administration Fund, and the Workers’
Compensation Special Fund; provided further, that all funds deposited during Fiscal Year 2026
into the following funds are authorized for expenditure and shall remain available for
expenditure until September 30, 2026: the Apprenticeship Fees Fund, the Jobs Trust Fund, and
the Wage Theft Prevention Fund;
(2) Department of Parks and Recreation: $83,599,782 (including $80,599,782
from local funds and $3,000,000 from other funds); provided, that all funds deposited in Fiscal
Year 2026 into the Parks and Recreation Fund are authorized for expenditure and shall remain
available for expenditure until September 30, 2026; provided further, that the Department of
Parks and Recreation is authorized to spend appropriated funds from the Parks and Recreation
Fund for the purposes set forth in section 4 of the Recreation Act of 1994, effective March 23,
1995 (D.C. Law 10-246; D.C. Official Code § 10-303);
(3) District of Columbia Public Charter School Board: $15,309,173 (including
$1,289,500 from local funds and $14,019,673 from other funds); provided, that the amount of
local funds appropriated for the District of Columbia Public Charter School Board shall be
increased by up to $1,000,000 pursuant to paragraph (2) under the heading “Appropriation of
Additional Resources”;
(4) District of Columbia Public Charter Schools: $1,396,113,287 from local
funds; provided, that there shall be quarterly disbursement of funds to the District of Columbia
public charter schools, with the first payment to occur within 15 days of the beginning of the
14

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
fiscal year; provided further, that if the entirety of this allocation has not been provided as
payments to any public charter schools currently in operation through the per pupil funding
formula, the funds shall remain available for expenditure until September 30, 2026 for public
education in accordance with section 2403(b)(2) of the District of Columbia School Reform Act
of 1995, approved April 26, 1996 (110 Stat. 1321; D.C. Official Code § 38-1804.03(b)(2));
provided further, that of the amounts made available to District of Columbia public charter
schools, $230,000 shall be made available to the Office of the Chief Financial Officer as
authorized by section 2403(b)(6) of the District of Columbia School Reform Act of 1995,
approved April 26, 1996 (110 Stat. 1321; D.C. Official Code § 38-1804.03(b)(6)); provided
further, that, notwithstanding the amounts otherwise provided under this heading or any other
provision of law, there shall be appropriated to the District of Columbia public charter schools on
July 1, 2026, an amount equal to 30 percent, or for new charter school local education agencies
that opened for the first time after December 31, 2025, an amount equal to 45 percent, of the
total amount of the local funds appropriations provided for payments to public charter schools in
the budget of the District of Columbia for Fiscal Year 2027 (as adopted by the District), and the
amount of such payment shall be chargeable against the final amount provided for such
payments for Fiscal Year 2027; provided further, that the annual financial audit for the
performance of an individual District of Columbia public charter school shall be funded by the
charter school;
(5) District of Columbia Public Library: $85,035,000 (including $82,448,895
from local funds, $1,249,106 from federal grant funds, $1,320,000 from other funds, and
$17,000 from private funds); provided, that not to exceed $8,500 of such amount, from local
funds, shall be available for the Chief Librarian of the District of Columbia Public Library for
official reception and representation expenses and for purposes consistent with the Discretionary
Funds Act of 1973, approved October 26, 1973 (87 Stat. 509; D.C. Official Code § 1-333.10);
provided further, that all funds deposited, without regard to fiscal year, into the following funds
are authorized for expenditure and shall remain available until expended: the Books From Birth
Fund; the Copies and Printing Fund; the DCPL Revenue-Generating Activities Fund; the E-Rate
Reimbursement Fund; and the Library Collections Account;
(6) District of Columbia Public Schools: $1,512,183,614 (including
$1,438,867,702 from local funds, $36,717,652 from federal grant funds, $13,355,283 from other
funds, $5,742,977 from private funds, and $17,500,000 from federal payment funds requested to
be appropriated by the Congress under the heading “Federal Payment for School Improvement”
in the Fiscal Year 2026 Federal Portion Budget Request Act of 2025); provided, that these
amounts shall be increased or decreased to reflect the amount of federal payment funds
appropriated by Congress for Fiscal Year 2026; provided further, that not to exceed $10,600 of
such local funds shall be available for the Chancellor for official reception and representation
expenses and for purposes consistent with the Discretionary Funds Act of 1973, approved
October 26, 1973 (87 Stat. 509; D.C. Official Code § 1-333.10); provided further, that,
15

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
notwithstanding the amounts otherwise provided under this heading or any other provision of
law, there shall be appropriated to the District of Columbia Public Schools on July 1, 2026, an
amount equal to 10 percent of the total amount of the local funds appropriations provided for the
District of Columbia Public Schools in the budget of the District of Columbia for Fiscal Year
2027 (as adopted by the District), and the amount of such payment shall be chargeable against
the final amount provided for the District of Columbia Public Schools for Fiscal Year 2027;
provided further, that all funds deposited, without regard to fiscal year, into the following funds
are authorized for expenditure and shall remain available for expenditure until September 30,
2026: the At-Risk Supplemental Allocation Preservation Fund, the Afterschool Program-
Copayment Fund, the District of Columbia Public Schools’ Nonprofit School Food Service
Fund, the District of Columbia Public Schools Sales and Sponsorship Fund, the E-Rate
Education Fund, and the Reserve Officer Training Corps Fund; provided further, that the District
of Columbia Public Schools is authorized to spend appropriated funds consistent with section
105(c)(5) of the Public Education Reform Amendment Act of 2007, effective June 12, 2007
(D.C. Law 17-9; D.C. Official Code § 38-174(c)(5)); provided further, that all funds deposited
during Fiscal Year 2026 into the DCPS School Facility Colocation Fund are authorized for
expenditure and shall remain available for expenditure until September 30, 2026;
(7) District of Columbia State Athletics Commission: $1,796,903 (including
$1,576,903 from local funds and $220,000 from other funds);
(8) Non-Public Tuition: $57,464,309 (including $56,864,309 from local funds and
$600,000 from federal grant funds);
(9) Office of the Deputy Mayor for Education: $37,155,451 (including
$36,905,451 from local funds, and $250,000 from private funds);
(10) Office of the State Superintendent of Education: $620,534,406 (including
$264,001,884 from local funds, $296,343,552 from federal grant funds, $785,000 from other
funds, $1,903,969 from private funds, $40,000,000 from federal payment funds requested to be
appropriated by the Congress under the heading “Federal Payment for Resident Tuition Support”
in the Fiscal Year 2026 Federal Portion Budget Request Act of 2025, and $17,500,000 from
federal payment funds requested to be appropriated by the Congress under the heading “Federal
Payment for School Improvement” in the Fiscal Year 2026 Federal Portion Budget Request Act
of 2025); provided, that these amounts shall be increased or decreased to reflect the amount of
federal payment funds appropriated by Congress for the agency for Fiscal Year 2026; provided
further, that all funds deposited, without regard to fiscal year, into the following funds are
authorized for expenditure and shall remain available for expenditure until September 30, 2026:
the Access to Quality Child Care Fund, the Charter School Credit Enhancement Fund, the
Special Education Enhancement Fund, and the Student Enrollment Fund; provided further, that
all funds deposited during Fiscal Year 2026 into the following funds are authorized for
expenditure and shall remain available for expenditure until September 30, 2026: the Community
Schools Fund, the Early Childhood Educator Pay Equity Fund, and the State Athletics Activities,
16

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
Programs, and Office Fund; provided further, that the amount of local funds appropriated for the
Office of the State Superintendent of Education shall be increased by up to $7,000,000 pursuant
to paragraph (2) under the heading “Appropriation of Additional Resources”;
(11) Special Education Transportation: $133,215,046 (including $123,215,046
from local funds and $10,000,000 in federal grant funds); provided, that, notwithstanding the
amounts otherwise provided under this heading or any other provision of law, there shall be
appropriated to the Special Education Transportation agency under the direction of the Office of
the State Superintendent of Education, on July 1, 2026, an amount equal to 10 percent of the total
amount of the local funds appropriations provided for the Special Education Transportation
agency in the budget for the District of Columbia for Fiscal Year 2027 (as adopted by the
District), and the amount of such payment shall be chargeable against the final amount provided
for the Special Education Transportation agency for Fiscal Year 2027; provided further, that
amounts appropriated under this paragraph may be used to offer financial incentives as necessary
to reduce the number of routes serving 2 or fewer students;
(12) State Board of Education: $3,823,597 from local funds;
(13) Teachers’ Retirement System: $75,498,000 from local funds;
(14) Unemployment Compensation Fund: $5,480,390 from local funds; and
(15) University of the District of Columbia Subsidy Account: $99,423,270 from
local funds; provided, that this appropriation shall not be available to subsidize the education of
nonresidents of the District at the University of the District of Columbia, unless the Board of
Trustees of the University of the District of Columbia adopts, for the fiscal year ending
September 30, 2026, a tuition-rate schedule that establishes the tuition rate for nonresident
students at a level no lower than the nonresident tuition rate charged at comparable public
institutions of higher education in the metropolitan area; provided further, that, notwithstanding
the amounts otherwise provided under this heading or any other provision of law, there shall be
appropriated to the University of the District of Columbia on July 1, 2026, an amount equal to 10
percent of the total amount of the local funds appropriations provided for the University of the
District of Columbia in the budget of the District of Columbia for Fiscal Year 2027 (as adopted
by the District), and the amount of such payment shall be chargeable against the final amount
provided for the University of the District of Columbia for Fiscal Year 2027; provided further,
that not to exceed $10,600 of such local funds shall be available for the President of the
University of the District of Columbia for official reception and representation expenses and for
purposes consistent with the Discretionary Funds Act of 1973, approved October 26, 1973 (87
Stat. 509; D.C. Official Code § 1-333.10).
HUMAN SUPPORT SERVICES
For human support services, $7,551,422,033 (including $2,446,980,664 from local funds,
$285,940,321 from dedicated taxes, $561,580,044 from federal grant funds, $59,991,690 from
other funds, $4,191,328,130 from Medicaid payments, $1,601,184 from private funds, and
17

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
$4,000,000 from federal payment funds requested to be appropriated by the Congress under the
heading “Federal Payment for Testing and Treatment of HIV/AIDS” in the Fiscal Year 2026
Federal Portion Budget Request Act of 2025); provided, that these amounts shall be increased or
decreased to reflect the amount of federal payment funds appropriated by Congress for Fiscal
Year 2026; to be allocated as follows:
(1) Child and Family Services Agency: $216,049,797 (including $168,271,964
from local funds, $47,682,675 from federal grant funds, and $95,158 from private funds);
(2) Department of Aging and Community Living: $64,214,163 (including
$49,639,895 from local funds, $11,266,008 from federal grant funds, and $3,308,260 from
Medicaid payments);
(3) Department of Behavioral Health: $379,182,166 (including $278,963,494
from local funds, $78,185,917 from federal grant funds, $4,021,730 from Medicaid payments,
$17,575,000 from other funds, and $436,024 from private funds); provided, that all funds
deposited, without regard to fiscal year, into the following funds are authorized for expenditure
and shall remain available or expenditure until September 30, 2026: the Addiction Prevention
and Recovery Administration-Choice in Drug Treatment (HCSN) Fund, the DMH Medicare and
3rd Party Reimbursement Fund, the DMH Federal Beneficiary Reimbursement Fund, and the
Opioid Abatement Fund;
(4) Department of Health: $315,819,039 (including $97,497,334 from local funds,
$190,602,064 from federal grant funds, $22,649,640 from other funds, $1,070,002 from private
funds, and $4,000,000 from federal payment funds requested to be appropriated by the Congress
under the heading “Federal Payment for Testing and Treatment of HIV/AIDS” in the Fiscal Year
2026 Federal Portion Budget Request Act of 2025); provided, that these amounts shall be
increased or decreased to reflect the amount of federal payment funds appropriated by Congress
for the agency for Fiscal Year 2026; provided further, that all funds deposited, without regard to
fiscal year, into the following funds are authorized for expenditure and shall remain available for
expenditure until September 30, 2026: the Animal Education and Outreach Fund, the Civil
Monetary Penalties Fund, the Communicable and Chronic Disease Prevention and Treatment
Fund, the Health Occupations Regulation Fund, the Health Professional Recruitment Fund
(Medical Loan Repayment), the Human Services Facility Fee Fund, and the Tobacco Use
Cessation Fund; provided further, that all funds deposited during Fiscal Year 2026 into the
following funds are authorized for expenditure and shall remain available for expenditure until
September 30, 2026: the Board of Medicine Fund, the ICF/MR Fees and Finds Fund, the
Pharmacy Protection Fund, the State Health Planning and Development Agency Admission Fees
Fund, and the State Health Planning and Development Agency Fees Fund;
(5) Department of Health Care Finance: $5,504,769,104 (including
$1,054,706,805 from local funds, $285,940,321 from dedicated taxes, $10,399,776 from federal
grant funds, $4,148,230,385 from Medicaid payments, and $5,491,817 from other funds);
provided, that all funds deposited, without regard to fiscal year, into the following funds are
18

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
authorized for expenditure and shall remain available for expenditure until September 30, 2026:
the DC HealthCare Alliance Reform Fund, the Home and Community-Based Services
Enhancement Fund, the Hospital Provider Fee Fund, the Hospital Fund, the Individual Insurance
Market Affordability and Stability Fund, the Nursing Facility Quality of Care Fund, and the
Stevie Sellow’s Quality Improvement Fund; provided further, that all funds deposited during
Fiscal Year 2026 into the following funds are authorized for expenditure and shall remain
available for expenditure until September 30, 2026: the Bill of Rights (Grievance and Appeals)
Fund, the Healthy DC and Health Care Expansion Fund, and the Medicaid Provider Fraud
Reimbursement; provided further, that the amount of local funds appropriated for the
Department of Health Care Finance shall be increased by up to $22,038,938 pursuant to
paragraph (2) under the heading “Appropriation of Additional Resources”;
(6) Department of Human Services: $838,746,227 (including $632,178,930 from
local funds, $187,064,353 from federal grant funds, $330,000 from other funds, and $19,172,945
from federal Medicaid payments); provided, that all funds deposited, without regard to fiscal
year, into the SNAP Reinvestment Fund are authorized for expenditure and shall remain
available for expenditure until September 30, 2026; provided, that all funds deposited during
Fiscal Year 2026 into the SSI Payback Fund are authorized for expenditure and shall remain
available for expenditure until September 30, 2026; provided further, that the amount of local
funds appropriated for the Department of Human Services shall be increased by up to $2,950,715
pursuant to paragraph (2) under the heading “Appropriation of Additional Resources”;
(7) Department on Disability Services: $229,398,222 (including $162,478,928
from local funds, $36,379,251 from federal grant funds, $16,594,811 from Medicaid payments,
and $13,945,234 from other funds); provided, that all funds deposited, without regard to fiscal
year, into the following funds are authorized for expenditure and shall remain available for
expenditure until September 30, 2026: the Contribution to Costs of Supports Fund, the Cost of
Care for Non-Medicaid Clients Fund, and the Randolph Shepherd Unassigned Facilities Fund;
(8) Office of the Deputy Mayor for Health and Human Services: $2,510,221 from
local funds; and
(9) Office of the Ombudsperson for Children: $733,094 from local funds.
OPERATIONS AND INFRASTRUCTURE
For operations and infrastructure, $1,679,913,395 (including $1,122,933,527 from local
funds, $75,491,699 from dedicated taxes, $184,665,516 from federal grant funds, $291,937,388
from other funds, and $4,885,264 from private funds), to be allocated as follows:
(1) Alcoholic Beverage and Cannabis Administration: $11,654,674 (including
$2,380,773 from local funds and $9,273,902 from other funds); provided, that all funds
deposited, without regard to fiscal year, into the following funds are authorized for expenditure
and shall remain available for expenditure until September 30, 2026: the Alcoholic Beverage and
Cannabis Administration Fund, the Dedicated Taxes Fund, and the Medical Cannabis
19

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
Administration Fund;
(2) Department of Buildings: $62,885,492 (including $47,827,333 from local
funds and $15,058,159 from other funds); provided, that all funds deposited in Fiscal Year 2026
into the following funds are authorized for expenditure and shall remain available for
expenditure until September 30, 2026: the Expedited Building Permit Review Fund, the Green
Building Fund, and the Nuisance Abatement Fund;
(3) Department of Energy and Environment: $254,236,187 (including
$19,411,307 from local funds, $141,339,181 from federal grant funds, $88,614,435 from other
funds and $4,871,264 from private funds); provided, that all funds deposited, without regard to
fiscal year, into the following funds are authorized for expenditure and shall remain available for
expenditure until September 30, 2026: the Air Quality Construction Permits Fund, the Anacostia
River Clean Up and Protection Fund, the Benchmarking Enforcement Fund, the Clean Land
Fund/Brownfield Revitalization Fund, the District of Columbia Wetland Stream and Mitigation
Trust Fund, the Economy II Fund, the Energy Assistance Trust Fund, the Fishing License Fund,
the Hazardous Waste and Toxic Chemical Source Reduction Fund, the Indoor Mold Assessment
and Remediation Fund, the Lead Poisoning Prevention Fund, the Leaking Underground Storage
Tank Trust Fund, the Mayor’s Energy Surcharge Fund, the Municipal Aggregation Fund, the
Pesticide Product Registration Fund, the Product Stewardship Fund, the Rail Safety and Security
Fund, the Renewable Energy Development Fund, the Residential Aid Discount Fund, the
Residential Essential Services Fund, the Soil Erosion and Sediment Control Fund, the Special
Energy Assessment Fund, the Stormwater Fees Fund, the Stormwater In-Lieu Fee Payment
Fund, the Storm Water Permit Review Fund, the Sustainable Energy Trust Fund, the
Underground Storage Tank Regulation Fund, and the WASA Utility Discount Program Fund;
provided further, that funds in the available fund balance of the Renewable Energy Development
Fund may be obligated in Fiscal Year 2026, pursuant to grant awards, through September 30,
2029, and that such funds so obligated are authorized for expenditure and shall remain available
for expenditure until September 30, 2029;
(4) Department of For-Hire Vehicles: $20,322,611 (including $11,364,304 from
local funds and $8,958,307 from other funds); provided, that all funds deposited, without regard
to fiscal year, into the following funds are authorized for expenditure and shall remain available
for expenditure until September 30, 2026: the Public Vehicles-for-Hire Consumer Service Fund
and the Taxicab Assessment Act Fund;
(5) Department of Insurance, Securities, and Banking: $35,257,203 (including
$138,870 from local funds and $35,118,333 from other funds); provided, that all funds deposited,
without regard to fiscal year, into the following funds are authorized for expenditure and shall
remain available for expenditure until September 30, 2026: the Capital Access Fund, the Captive
Insurance Fund, the Foreclosure Mediation Fund, the HMO Assessment Fund, the Insurance
Assessment Fund, the Insurance Regulatory Trust Fund, the Loan Participation Fund, and the
Securities and Banking Fund;
20

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
(6) Department of Licensing and Consumer Protection: $30,765,162 (including
$16,187,950 from local funds and $14,577,213 from other funds); provided, that all funds
deposited in Fiscal Year 2026 into the following funds are authorized for expenditure and shall
remain available for expenditure until September 30, 2026: the Basic Business License Fund, the
Corporate Recordation Fund, the Combat Sports Commission Fund, the Occupational and
Professional Licensing Administration Special Account, and the Vending Regulation Fund;
provided further, that all funds deposited, without regard to fiscal year, into the following funds
are authorized for expenditure and shall remain available for expenditure until September 30,
2026: the Appraisal Fee Fund and the Real Estate Guaranty and Education Fund;
(7) Department of Motor Vehicles: $73,756,978 (including $65,362,686 from
local funds and $8,394,292 from other funds); provided, that all funds deposited, without regard
to fiscal year, into the Department of Motor Vehicles Kiosk Fund and the Motor Vehicle
Inspection Fund are authorized for expenditure and shall remain available for expenditure until
September 30, 2026;
(8) Department of Public Works: $192,319,837 (including $176,351,410 from
local funds and $15,968,427 from other funds); provided, that all funds deposited, without regard
to fiscal year, into the following funds are authorized for expenditure and shall remain available
for expenditure until September 30, 2026: the Solid Waste Disposal Cost Recovery Special
Account and the Super Can Program Fund;
(9) District Department of Transportation: $176,226,426 (including $104,649,265
from local funds, $42,695,508 from federal grant funds, and $28,881,654 from other funds);
provided, that all funds deposited, without regard to fiscal year, into the following funds are
authorized for expenditure and shall remain available for expenditure until September 30, 2026:
the Bicycle Sharing Fund, the Bus Service Enhancement Fund, the DC Circulator Fund, the DC
Water Facility Work Fund, the DDOT Enterprise Fund-Non Tax Revenues Fund, the Parking
Meter and Transit Services Pay-by-Phone Transaction Fee Fund, the Performance Parking
Program Fund, the Sustainable Transportation Fund, the Tree Fund, the Transportation Initiatives
Fund, and the Transportation Infrastructure Project Review Fund; provided further, that there are
appropriated any amounts received, or to be received, without regard to fiscal year, from the
Potomac Electric Power Company, or any of its related companies, successors, or assigns, for the
purpose of paying or reimbursing the District Department of Transportation for the costs of
designing, constructing, acquiring, and installing facilities, infrastructure, and equipment for use
and ownership by the Potomac Electric Power Company, or any of its related companies,
successors, or assigns, related to or associated with the undergrounding of electric distribution
lines in the District of Columbia, and any interest earned on those funds, which amounts and
interest shall not revert to the unrestricted fund balance of the General Fund at the end of a fiscal
year or at any other time, but shall be continually available without regard to fiscal year
limitation until expended for the designated purposes;
(10) Office of the People’s Counsel: $13,914,444 (including $969,482 from local
21

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
funds and $12,944,962 from other funds); provided, that all funds deposited, without regard to
fiscal year, into the Office of People’s Counsel Agency Fund are authorized for expenditure and
shall remain available for expenditure until September 30, 2026;
(11) Public Service Commission: $20,792,531 (including $630,827 from federal
grant funds, $20,147,704 from other funds, and $14,000 from private funds); provided, that all
funds deposited, without regard to fiscal year, into the following funds are authorized for
expenditure and shall remain available for expenditure until September 30, 2026: the PJM
Settlement Fund and the Public Service Commission Agency Fund;
(12) Washington Metropolitan Area Transit Authority: $787,599,699 (including
$678,108,000 from local funds, $75,491,699 from dedicated taxes, and $34,000,000 from other
funds); provided, that all funds deposited, without regard to fiscal year, into the following funds
are authorized for expenditure and shall remain available for expenditure until September 30,
2026: the Dedicated Taxes Fund and the Parking Meter WMATA Fund; provided further, that all
funds budgeted without regard to fiscal year for the adult learner transit subsidy program
established by section 6047 of the Student, Foster Youth, Summer Youth Employee, and Adult
Learner Transit Subsidies Act of 2019, effective September 11, 2019 (D.C. Law 23-16; D.C.
Official Code § 35-246), are authorized for expenditure and shall remain available for
expenditure until September 30, 2026; provided further, that there are appropriated any amounts
deposited, or to be deposited, without regard to fiscal year, into the Washington Metropolitan
Area Transit Authority Dedicated Financing Fund for the purpose of funding WMATA capital
improvements, which amounts shall not revert to the unrestricted fund balance of the General
Fund at the end of a fiscal year or at any other time, but shall be continually available until
expended for the designated purposes; and
(13) Washington Metropolitan Area Transit Commission: $182,149 from local
funds.
FINANCING AND OTHER
For financing and other costs, $2,264,898,624 (including $1,755,410,971 from local
funds, $380,686,215 from dedicated taxes, $3,234,362 from federal grant funds, $253,450 from
Medicaid payments, $14,295 from private funds, $65,192,406 from other funds, $21,891 from
enterprise and other – dedicated tax, $85,033 from enterprise and other funds, and $60,000,000
from federal payment funds requested to be appropriated by the Congress under the heading
“Federal Payment for Emergency Planning and Security Costs in the District of Columbia” in the
Fiscal Year 2026 Federal Portion Budget Request Act of 2025); provided, that these amounts
shall be increased or decreased to reflect the amount of federal payment funds appropriated by
Congress for the agency for Fiscal Year 2026; to be allocated as follows:
(1) Commercial Paper Program: $17,675,000 from local funds;
(2) Convention Center Transfer: $185,838,297 (including $7,100,000 from local
funds and $178,738,297 from dedicated taxes);
22

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
(3) Debt Service - Issuance Costs: $11,000,000 from local funds for the payment
of debt service issuance costs;
(4) District of Columbia Highway Transportation Fund: $47,890,798 (including
$21,152,000 from dedicated taxes and $26,738,798 from other funds);
(5) District Retiree Health Contribution: $73,600,000 from local funds for a
District Retiree Health Contribution;
(6) Emergency Planning and Security Fund: $60,000,000 from federal payment
funds requested to be appropriated by the Congress under the heading “Federal Payment for
Emergency Planning and Security Costs in the District of Columbia” in the Fiscal Year 2026
Federal Portion Budget Request Act of 2025; provided, that this amount shall be increased or
decreased to reflect the amount of federal payment funds appropriated by Congress for
Emergency Planning and Security for Fiscal Year 2026; provided further, that, notwithstanding
any other law, obligations and expenditures that are pending reimbursement under the heading
“Federal Payment for Emergency Planning and Security Costs in the District of Columbia” may
be charged to this appropriations heading;
(7) John A. Wilson Building Fund: $4,813,841 from local funds for expenses
associated with the John A. Wilson building;
(8) Non-Departmental: $1,500,000 from local funds; provided, that the amount of
local funds appropriated for the Non-Departmental Agency shall be increased by $608,000
pursuant to paragraph (2) under the heading “Appropriation of Additional Resources”;
(9) Pay-As-You-Go Capital Fund: $257,962,792 (including $42,143,928 from
local funds, $178,500,000 from dedicated taxes, and $37,318,864 from other funds) to be
transferred to the Capital Fund, in lieu of capital financing;
(10) Repayment of Loans and Interest: $1,323,334,899 (including $1,321,688,967
from local funds and $1,645,932 from federal grant funds), for payment of principal, interest,
and certain fees directly resulting from borrowing by the District of Columbia to fund District of
Columbia capital projects as authorized by sections 462, 475, and 490 of the District of
Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 774; D.C. Official Code §§ 1-
204.61, 1-204.75, and 1-204.90);
(11) Repayment of Revenue Bonds: $2,259,877 from dedicated taxes for the
repayment of revenue bonds;
(12) Settlements and Judgments: $28,000,000 from local funds for making
refunds and for the payment of legal settlements or judgments that have been entered against the
District of Columbia government; provided, that this amount may be increased by such sums as
may be necessary for making refunds and for the payment of legal settlements or judgments that
have been entered against the District of Columbia government and such sums may be paid from
the applicable or available funds of the District of Columbia; and
(13) Workforce Investments Account: $251,023,120 (including $247,889,235
from local funds, $36,041 from dedicated taxes, $1,588,430 from federal grant funds, $253,450
23

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
from Medicaid funds, $1,134,744 from other funds, $14,295 from private funds, $21,891 from
enterprise and other – dedicated tax; and $85,033 from enterprise and other); provided, that all
funds deposited, without regard to fiscal year, into the Workforce Investments Account are
authorized for expenditure and shall remain available for expenditure until September 30, 2026.
ENTERPRISE FUNDS
The amount of $2,444,449,903 (including $2,217,331,094 from enterprise and other
funds and $227,118,809 from enterprise and other funds - dedicated taxes), shall be provided to
enterprise funds as follows; provided, that, in the event that revenue dedicated by local law to an
enterprise fund exceeds the amount set forth as follows, the General Fund budget authority may
be increased as needed to transfer all such revenue, pursuant to local law, to the enterprise fund:
(1) Ballpark Revenue Fund: $132,217,913 (including $119,956,289 from
enterprise and other funds - dedicated taxes and $12,261,624 from enterprise and other funds);
(2) District of Columbia Retirement Board: $39,739,954 from the earnings of the
applicable retirement funds to pay legal, management, investment, and other fees and
administrative expenses of the District of Columbia Retirement Board;
(3) District of Columbia Water and Sewer Authority: $838,132,574 from
enterprise and other funds; provided, that not to exceed $25,000 of this amount shall be available
for reception and representation expenses; provided further, that not to exceed $15,000 of this
amount shall be available for official meetings. For construction projects, $8,905,835,000, to be
distributed as follows: $1,695,173,000 for Wastewater Treatment; $2,571,706,000 for the
Sanitary Sewer System; $2,686,852,000 for the Water System; $194,872,000 for Non Process
Facilities; $915,219,000 for the Combined Sewer Overflow Program; $465,010,000 for the
Washington Aqueduct; $57,631,000 for the Stormwater Program; and $319,372,000 for the
capital equipment program; in addition, $8,000,000 for Federal payment funds requested to be
appropriated by the Congress under the heading “Federal Payment to the District of Columbia
Water and Sewer Authority” in the Fiscal Year 2026 Federal Portion Budget Request Act of
2025, provided, that these amounts shall be increased or decreased to reflect the amount of
federal payment funds appropriated by Congress for the agency for Fiscal Year 2026;
(4) Green Finance Authority: $3,750,000 from enterprise and other funds, to be
available until expended;
(5) Health Benefit Exchange Authority: $41,634,470 from enterprise and other
funds;
(6) Housing Finance Agency: $18,355,000 from enterprise and other funds;
provided, that all funds budgeted without regard to fiscal year for the Reverse Mortgage
Foreclosure Prevention Program are authorized for expenditure and shall remain available for
expenditure until September 30, 2026; provided further, that all funds budgeted without regard to
fiscal year for the Public Housing Credit-Building Pilot Program are authorized for expenditure
and shall remain available for expenditure until September 30, 2026;
24

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
(7) Housing Production Trust Fund: $100,000,000 (including $49,257,000 from
enterprise and other funds - dedicated taxes and $50,743,000 from enterprise and other funds);
provided, that all funds deposited, without regard to fiscal year, into the Housing Production
Trust Fund are authorized for expenditure and shall remain available for expenditure until
September 30, 2026; provided further, that the amount of local funds appropriated for the
Housing Production Trust Fund shall be increased by up to $10,000,000 pursuant to paragraph
(2) under the heading “Appropriation of Additional Resources”;
(8) Office of Lottery and Gaming: $272,199,697 from enterprise and other funds;
provided, that, after notification to the Mayor, amounts appropriated herein may be increased by
an amount necessary for the Lottery, Gambling, and Gaming Fund to make transfers to the
General Fund and to cover prizes, agent commissions, and gaming-related fees directly
associated with unanticipated excess lottery revenues not included in this appropriation;
(9) Other Post-Employment Benefits Trust Administration: $8,765,834 from
enterprise and other funds;
(10) Repayment of PILOT Financing: $12,992,254 from enterprise and other
funds - dedicated taxes;
(11) RFK Campus Infrastructure Fund: $0 from enterprise and other funds;
(12) Tax Increment Financing Program: $44,913,266 from enterprise and other
funds - dedicated taxes;
(13) Unemployment Insurance Trust Fund: $181,261,204 from enterprise and
other funds;
(14) Universal Paid Leave Fund: $139,758,882 from enterprise and other funds;
provided, that all funds deposited, without regard to fiscal year, are authorized for expenditure
and shall remain available for expenditure until September 30, 2026;
(15) University of the District of Columbia: $229,982,595 from enterprise and
other funds; provided, that these funds shall not revert to the General Fund at the end of a fiscal
year or at any other time, but shall be continually available for expenditure until September 30,
2026, without regard to fiscal year limitation; provided further, that all funds deposited, without
regard to fiscal year, into the Higher Education Incentive Program Fund are authorized for
expenditure and shall remain available for expenditure until September 30, 2026;
(16) Washington Aqueduct: $120,316,064 from enterprise and other funds; and
(17) Washington Convention and Sports Authority: $260,430,195 from enterprise
and other funds.
RESERVE ACCOUNTS
(1) Cash Flow Reserve Account: All funds deposited, without regard to fiscal
year, into the Cash Flow Reserve Account, established pursuant to D.C. Official Code § 47-
392.02(j-2), are authorized for expenditure and shall remain available for expenditure until
September 30, 2026.
25

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
(2) Fiscal Stabilization Reserve Account: All funds deposited, without regard to
fiscal year, into the Fiscal Stabilization Reserve Account, established pursuant to D.C. Official
Code § 47-392.02(j-1), are authorized for expenditure and shall remain available for expenditure
until September 30, 2026.
CAPITAL OUTLAY
For capital construction projects, a net increase of $1,745,849,000, of which
$1,341,007,000 shall be from local funds, $33,616,000 shall be from local transportation funds,
$6,300,000 shall be from federal funds, $52,747,000 shall be from the District of Columbia
Highway Trust Fund, and $312,179,000 shall be from the federal Highway Trust Fund, to remain
available until expended; provided, that all funds provided by this act shall be available only for
the specific projects and purposes intended; provided further, that amounts appropriated under
this act may be increased by the amount transferred from funds appropriated in this act as Pay-
As-You-Go Capital funds.
APPROPRIATION OF ADDITIONAL RESOURCES
(1) The amount appropriated as local funds shall be increased by an amount up to
$51,522,144, which amount shall be authorized for obligation and expenditure pursuant to
paragraph (2) under this heading if and to the extent that the September 2025 quarterly revenue
estimate for local funds in Fiscal Year 2025 exceeds the revenue estimate of the Chief Financial
Officer of the District of Columbia incorporated in the approved budget and financial plan for
Fiscal Year 2025 and Fiscal Year 2025 revenues exceed actual expenditures as estimated by the
Chief Financial Officer no later than November 15, 2025.
(2) The additional revenues authorized to be obligated and expended pursuant to
paragraph (1) under this heading shall be allocated as follows:
(A) $5,500,000 to the Childcare Subsidy Program at the Office of the State
Superintendent of Education in Fiscal Year 2026;
(B) $1,500,000 to the Early Childhood Educator Pay Equity Fund at the
Office of the State Superintendent of Education in Fiscal Year 2026;
(C) $10,000,000 to the Housing Production Trust Fund in Fiscal Year
2026;
(D) $3,500,000 to the Department of Forensic Sciences for in-house DNA
testing in Fiscal Year 2026;
(E) $500,000 to the Department of Healthcare Finance to increase the
Medicaid personal needs allowance in Fiscal Year 2026 and in each of Fiscal Years 2027, 2028,
and 2029;
(F) $2,950,715 to the Department of Human Services for the Emergency
Rental Assistance Program in Fiscal Year 2026;
(G) $1,000,000 to the Housing Preservation Fund at the Department of
26

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
Housing and Community Development in Fiscal Year 2026;
(H) $1,000,000 to the District of Columbia Public Charter School Board
for lead pipe testing in charter schools in Fiscal Year 2026;
(I) $608,000 to Non-Departmental to fund the repeal of section 401 of the
Amplified Sound Mitigation Regulation Amendment Act of 2024, effective March 21, 2025
(D.C. Law 25-313; 72 DCR 1095), in Fiscal Year 2026, and $419,874 for the same purpose in
Fiscal Year 2027, $428,561 for the same purpose in Fiscal Year 2028, and $437,429 for the same
purpose in Fiscal Year 2029;
(J) $459,000 to the Metropolitan Police Department for housing incentives
for police officers in Fiscal Year 2027, and $179,628 for the same purpose in Fiscal Year 2028;
and
(K) $21,538,938 in funds shall be allocated to the Department of Health
Care Finance for the DC Healthcare Alliance Program to delay to October 1, 2026, the effective
date to limit the types of services provided by the program to enrollees aged 21 or older under
section 7(a-1)(1) of the Health Care Privatization Amendment Act of 2001, effective July 12,
2001 (D.C. Law 14-18; D.C. Official Code § 7-1405(a-1)(1)).
(3) The District of Columbia may obligate and expend the increase in the amount
of funds authorized under this heading only if the Chief Financial Officer certifies the increase in
revenue pursuant to paragraph (1) under this heading, unless the Chief Financial Officer further
certifies that such use is anticipated to have a negative impact on the long-term financial plan of
the District.
Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement of the Chief Financial Officer as the fiscal
impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § l-301.47a).
Sec. 4. Effective date.
As provided in section 446(a) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved
December 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 801; D.C. Official Code § 1-204.46(a)), this act shall take effect
following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the Mayor, action by the Council to
override the veto) and a 30-day period of congressional review as provided in section 602(c)(1)
27

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C.
Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)).
___________________________________
Chairman
Council of the District of Columbia
_________________________________
Mayor
District of Columbia
28